California statutes. Public Utilities Code
-------------------------------------------

6452.

The resettlement franchise shall be granted after such publication and upon such notice as the governing or legislative body shall by resolution determine, or failing such determination, after such publication and upon such notice as is prescribed by law for the enactment of ordinances by the governing or legislative body.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6453.

After the final passage of a resettlement franchise, it shall be referred and submitted to the vote of the electors of the city or city and county at the general or special election next ensuing not less than 20 days after the final passage of the ordinance, or if no general or special election is to be held in the city or city and county within a period of not less than 20 days and not more than 90 days after such final passage, the governing or legislative body may call a special election to submit the ordinance to the electors, the special election to be held not less than 30 days and not more than 60 days after such final passage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6454.

No resettlement franchise shall go into effect until it has received the approval of a majority of the electors voting thereon and until it has been accepted in writing by the grantee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6455.

Every resettlement franchise, permit, or privilege shall confer upon the grantee the right to occupy the roads, streets, highways, avenues, boulevards, lanes, alleys, courts, places, and pathways of the city or city and county, particularly set out in the terms and conditions of the franchise, permit, or privilege, for the purpose of conducting, operating and maintaining thereon a street, suburban, or interurban railroad, subject always to the right of the city or city and county to acquire and possess the property of the grantee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6456.

The grantee shall pay to the city or city and county such a percentage of the net revenue annually collected from any and all sources under and by virtue of the franchise, permit, or privilege as is fixed in the franchise. What constitutes such annual net revenue shall be provided in the franchise.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6457.

The legislative or governing body may in a resettlement franchise provide that any new franchise granted to the holder of the resettlement franchise shall be considered as part of the resettlement franchise.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6458.

The legislative or governing body may in the resettlement franchise provide that in case of consolidation or annexation to the city or city and county of any territory after the date the resettlement franchise is granted, any franchise to operate the street, suburban, or interurban railroad, or any part thereof, held or claimed by the holder of the resettlement franchise in or for any portion of the consolidated or annexed territory shall thereupon be surrendered to the city or city and county, and that the rights and obligations of the resettlement franchise shall thereupon automatically extend to the additional territory, and that a valuation for the purpose of public
 acquisition of the properties used and useful, or, in the discretion of the city or city and county, prospectively useful, in the operation of the street, suburban, or interurban railroad in the area consolidated or annexed, and not included in the capital valuation already fixed in the resettlement franchise, shall be added to the capital account of the resettlement franchise grantee at a valuation for the purpose of public acquisition fixed by the Public Utilities Commission, and otherwise determined as provided in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6459.

Every resettlement franchise shall provide that the grantee shall surrender the franchises or rights, owned or claimed by the grantee, to occupy such portion of the roads, streets, highways, avenues, boulevards, lanes, alleys, courts, places, and pathways as it is proposed that the street, suburban, or interurban railroad shall thereafter occupy under the provisions of the resettlement franchise, and that the grantee shall accept in lieu thereof the rights and privileges granted by the resettlement franchise as a franchise for the continued operation of the street, suburban, or interurban railroad within the limits of the city or city and county or such portion thereof as had
 theretofore been operated under the franchise or franchises surrendered.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6460.

The resettlement franchise, permit, or privilege shall be granted for an indeterminate period, subject always to the right of the city or city and county to acquire and possess the property of the grantee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6461.

The resettlement franchise shall be granted upon the express condition that the city or city and county may, at a valuation for the purpose of public acquisition, fixed and determined as provided in Section 6462, assume ownership by purchase, or take over and possess the property used and useful, or, in the discretion of the city or city and county, prospectively useful property of the franchise grantee, its successors or assigns, upon giving the grantee written notice of its intention to purchase and take over the property, which notice shall be given only when authorized by ordinance of the legislative or governing body of the city or city and county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6462.

The valuation for the purpose of public acquisition of property used and useful, or in the discretion of the city or city and county prospectively useful, and owned by the grantee at the time application is made for a resettlement franchise, permit, or privilege shall be fixed by the Public Utilities Commission. The valuation of such property as fixed by the commission may be set forth in the resettlement franchise, permit, or privilege, in which case a readjustment from time to time of this valuation by the addition of the cost of extensions and betterments and by the deduction of the value of property sold or abandoned, and of the amount of depreciation sustained by the
 property used or useful or prospectively useful, shall be made in such manner as may in the resettlement franchise be provided.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6463.

All expenses of the valuation by the Public Utilities Commission shall be paid by the city or city and county to the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6464.

The resettlement franchise shall provide that the grantee, its successors or assigns, shall never claim before any court or other public authority in any proceeding of any character any value for the resettlement franchise, permit, or privilege in excess of the amount originally paid for it by the grantee to the granting authority.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6465.

The resettlement franchise may be amended from time to time by ordinance passed by the governing or legislative body of the city or city and county and ratified by the electors of the city or city and county in the manner prescribed for the passage of the resettlement franchise in the first instance, and not otherwise. No such amendment is effective unless accepted in writing by the grantee of the resettlement franchise.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6466.

The power of the State, in the exercise of its police power or otherwise through the instrumentality of the Public Utilities Commission or other agency, to provide at any and all times for the supervision and regulation of public utilities is not affected by any franchise, permit, or privilege granted under this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6467.

Nothing in this chapter, nor any provision of any franchise granted under this chapter, shall prevent a city or city and county from acquiring at any time the property of any public utility through the exercise of the right of eminent domain, and no city or county shall contract away, either for a term or in perpetuity, the right of eminent domain in respect to any public utility.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 3.5. UTILITY RELOCATION AGREEMENTS [7000. - 7005.]



CHAPTER 1. Relocation for Transit or Transportation Capital Improvement Projects [7000. - 7005.]

7000.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, a utility shall mean all of the following:

(1) An electric corporation.

(2) A water corporation.

(3) A telephone corporation.

(4) A telecommunications carrier, as defined in Section 153 of Title 47 of the United States Code.

(5) A gas corporation.

(6) A local publicly owned electric utility and a publicly owned gas utility.

(7) A special district that owns or operates utilities.

(b) This chapter shall also apply to the following entities:

(1) A cable television corporation.

(2) A cable operator, as defined in Section 522 of Title 47 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 558, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

7001.

For purposes of this chapter, “authority” means the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority, as defined in Section 100011.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 655, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7002.

When a utility enters into a relocation agreement with the authority in connection with a transit or transportation capital improvement project, the agreement may include, but not be limited to, the following elements, as agreed to by the parties:

(a) Location of the work to be completed.

(b) Cost arrangements between the parties for the work to be conducted.

(c) Schedule for the work to be completed.

(d) Remedies for contract impairment.

(e) Definition of default on the part of either party.

(f) Remedies for default by either party.

(g) What constitutes abandonment of utility relocation work, and remedies for addressing any abandonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 655, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7003.

(a) If a utility, cable television corporation, or cable operator abandons utility relocation work under a relocation agreement with the authority in connection with a transit or transportation capital improvement project, the authority may, pursuant to the terms of the relocation agreement made pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 7002, assume from the utility, cable television corporation, or cable operator the work of relocating utilities that relates to the project within the jurisdiction of the authority.

(b) (1) The authority may issue contracts with another qualified entity to conduct the utility relocation work.

(2) If a collective bargaining agreement specifically does not prohibit a crew or other subgroup of employees of a utility, cable television corporation, or cable operator from performing utility relocation work under a contract with the authority in the case where work has been abandoned by the utility, cable television corporation, or cable operator, then the authority shall offer a first right of refusal to a crew or other subgroup of employees of the utility, cable television corporation, or cable operator, that are qualified to conduct utility relocation work to contract with the authority for the utility relocation work.

(3) If the crew or subgroup identified in paragraph (2) elects not to contract with the authority to conduct the utility relocation work, the authority shall choose a qualified entity from a single list provided by the utility, cable television corporation, or cable operator and, if applicable, the collective bargaining representative of the utility employees that would otherwise perform the work, provided that the utility, cable television corporation, or cable operator, and, if applicable, the collective bargaining representative, choose to provide a list.

(c) Any utility relocation work performed or caused to be performed by the authority shall be done according to industry standards, under the oversight of the utility, cable television corporation, or cable operator, and upon acceptance by the utility, cable television corporation, or cable operator.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 655, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7004.

The rights and remedies available to the authority under this article are nonexclusive and are cumulative to each other and to the remedies or penalties available to the authority under all other laws or pursuant to contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 655, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7005.

This chapter applies only if all of the following occurs:

(a) The authority has executed a formal, written utility relocation agreement with the utility, cable television corporation, or cable operator.

(b) The utility, cable television corporation, or cable operator abandons the relocation work because of financial hardship or other reasons.

(c) The utility relocation agreement executed by the authority and the utility, cable television corporation, or cable operator allows for the authority to assume the utility relocation work as recourse for the work being abandoned by the utility, cable television corporation, or cable operator.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 655, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4. LAWS RELATING TO UTILITY CORPORATIONS AND THEIR EMPLOYEES [7503. - 8290.2.]



CHAPTER 1. Railroad Corporations [7503. - 7727.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration and Finance [7503. - 7508.]

7503.

Any person or any corporation formed under the laws of this State or of any other state within the United States that the directors of a railroad corporation may by unanimous concurrence select, may be trustees in any deed of trust securing bonds, debentures, notes, and evidences of indebtedness issued by such railroad corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

7505.

(a) Revenue derived from passenger rail service on the Northwestern Pacific Railroad right-of-way south of Willits to Larkspur shall only be used for capital improvements to, and operating expenses of, the passenger rail service south of Willits to Larkspur.

(b) Real property on which the Northwestern Pacific Railroad right-of-way south of Willits to Larkspur is located shall not be pledged or mortgaged to fund capital improvements on the right-of-way north of
 Willits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 212, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

7508.

Subject to the provisions of Part 1 of Division 1 and of the Corporations Code, any railroad corporation, or person or corporation owning any railroad in this State, may sell, convey, and transfer its property and franchises, or any part thereof, to any other railroad corporation, whether organized under the laws of this State or of any other state or territory, or under any act of Congress. The railroad corporation receiving the conveyance may hold and operate the railroad franchises and property within this State, build and operate extensions and branches thereof, exercise the right of eminent domain for such purposes, and do any other business in connection therewith,
 as fully and effectually as if the corporation was organized under the laws of this State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1031.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties [7526. - 7538.]

7526.

Every railroad corporation has all of the following powers:

(a) To make such examination and surveys as are necessary to the selection of the most advantageous route for the railroad. The officers, agents, and employees of the corporation may enter upon the lands or waters of any person, for this purpose, subject to liability for all damages which they do thereto.

(b) To receive, hold, take, and convey, by deed or otherwise, as a natural person, such voluntary grants and donations of real estate and other property as are made to it to aid and
 encourage the construction, maintenance, and accommodation of the railroad.

(c) To purchase, or by voluntary grants or donations to receive, enter, take possession of, hold, and use all such real estate and other property as is necessary for the construction and maintenance of such railroad, and for all stations, depots, and other purposes necessary to successfully work and conduct the business of the road.

(d) To lay out its road, not exceeding 10 rods wide, and to construct and maintain it, with one or more tracks, and with such appendages and adjuncts as are necessary for the convenient use of the road.

(e) To construct its roads across, along, or upon any stream of water, watercourse, roadstead, bay, navigable stream, street, avenue, or highway, or across any railway, canal, ditch, or flume which the route of its
 road intersects, crosses, or runs along, in such manner as to afford security for life and property. The corporation shall restore the stream or watercourse, road, street, avenue, highway, railroad, canal, ditch, or flume thus intersected to its former state of usefulness as near as may be, or so that the railroad does not unnecessarily impair its usefulness or injure its franchise.

(f) To cross, intersect, join, or unite its railroad with any other railroad, either before or after construction, at any point upon its route, and upon the grounds of the other railroad corporation, with the necessary turnouts, sidings, and switches, and other conveniences in furtherance of the objects of its connections. Every corporation whose railroad is intersected by any new railroad shall unite with the owners of the new railroad in forming the intersections and connections, and grant facilities therefor. If the two corporations cannot agree upon the amount
 of compensation to be made therefor, or the points or the manner of the crossings, intersections, and connections, such matters shall be ascertained and determined as is provided in Part 1 (commencing with Section 201) of Division 1.

(g) To acquire lands, timber, stone, gravel, or other materials to be used in the construction and maintenance of its road, and all necessary appendages and adjuncts.

(h) To change the line of its road, in whole or in part, whenever a majority of the directors so determine, as provided in Section 7531, but the change shall not vary the general route of the road, as contemplated in its articles of incorporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

7527.

Every railroad corporation also has all of the following powers:

(a) To carry persons and property on its railroad, and to receive tolls or compensation therefor.

(b) To erect and maintain all necessary and convenient buildings, stations, depots, fixtures, and machinery for the accommodation and use of its passengers, freight, and business.

(c) To regulate the time and manner in which passengers and property shall be transported, and the tolls and compensation to be paid therefor
 within the limits prescribed by law and subject to alteration, change, or amendment by the Legislature at any time.

(d) To regulate the force and speed of its locomotives, cars, trains, or other machinery used and employed on its roads.

(e) To establish, execute, and enforce all needful and proper rules and regulations for the management of its business transactions usual and proper for railroad corporations.

(f) To purchase, lease, or acquire the franchises, rights, and property, or any part thereof, of any railroad corporation, leasing or owning any railroad outside of the State, to operate it and use the franchises of any such road, and to build and operate extensions thereof.

(g) To purchase, acquire, and hold the stocks, bonds, or other securities
 of any railroad corporation organized under the laws of this State or of any other state or territory, with full power to sell them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1028.)
-------------------------------------------

7528.

Every person or corporation authorized to operate a railroad is authorized to use steam, diesel, electricity, compressed air, or any other suitable motive power, for the purpose of propelling cars or trains on the railroad or upon any portion thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1027.)
-------------------------------------------

7529.

Railroad corporations doing business in this State and organized under any law of this State or the United States, or of any state or territory thereof, may enter into contracts with one another, whereby the one may lease of the other the whole or any part of its railroad, or may acquire of the other the right to use, in common with it, the whole or any part of its railroad.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7530.

Every railroad corporation in this State shall, within a reasonable time after its road is finally located, make a map and profile thereof, and of the land acquired for the use thereof, and the boundaries of the several counties through which the road may run, and file it in the Office of the Secretary of State. Every railroad corporation shall file like maps of the parts of the railroad located in different counties in the office of the clerk of the county in which such parts of the road are, there to remain of record forever. The maps and profiles shall be certified by the chief engineer, the acting president, and the secretary of the company. Copies of the map and
 profiles, so certified and filed, shall be kept in the office of the secretary of the corporation, subject to examination by all parties interested.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7531.

If, at any time after the location of the line of the railroad and the filing of the maps and profiles thereof, it appears that the location can be improved, the directors may alter or change the location of the line, and cause new maps and profiles to be filed, showing such changes, in the same offices where the originals are of file. The directors may proceed, in the same manner as the original location was acquired, to acquire and take possession of the new line, but shall sell or relinquish the lands owned by them for the original location, within five years after such change. No new location, as herein provided, shall be so run as to avoid any points named in their
 articles of incorporation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7531.5.

Upon receipt by it of an application, filed with either the federal Surface Transportation Board or the Public Utilities Commission, to abandon a line of railroad, the Public Utilities Commission shall forward a copy of the application to the Department of Transportation within 10 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 89.4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

7533.

The board of directors of any railroad corporation may at any time after the original location and construction of its railroad, in order to provide better facilities for the public service, construct an additional main line track or tracks either adjacent to the located and operated line or otherwise, but always in whole or in part between the same termini. The railroad corporation may, without abandoning the original location, acquire such rights of way as are necessary for the additional track or tracks, with their appendages and adjuncts, of a similar width as provided in Section 7526 for the original location, either by purchase or condemnation, as therein provided,
 and may operate the additional tracks in conjunction with any tracks previously constructed, as additional facilities for the railroad system. Nothing herein supersedes or repeals any law relating to the regulation of railroad corporations by the commission, or any law requiring railroads to obtain franchises from the cities or counties through which the additional tracks may pass.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7535.

Whenever the track of one railroad intersects or crosses the track of another railroad, whether it is a street railroad, wholly within the limits of a city, or other railroad, the rails of either or each road shall be so cut and adjusted as to permit the passage of the cars on each road with as little obstruction as possible. If the persons or corporations owning the railroads cannot agree as to the compensation to be made for cutting and adjusting the rails, the condemnation of the right of way over the one for the use of the other road may be had in proceedings under Title 7, Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and damages assessed and the right of way granted as in
 other cases.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7536.

Whenever the track of a railroad crosses another railroad or a highway, such railroad or highway may be carried under, over, or on a level with the track, as is most expedient. Where an embankment or cutting necessitates a change in the line of such railroad or highway, the corporation may take such additional lands and material as are necessary for the construction of the road or highway on the new line. If the necessary lands cannot be had otherwise, they may be condemned as provided in Title 7, Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and when compensation is made therefor the lands become the property of the corporation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7537.

The owner of any lands along or through which any railroad is constructed or maintained, may have such farm or private crossings over the railroad and railroad right of way as are reasonably necessary or convenient for ingress to or egress from such lands, or in order to connect such lands with other adjacent lands of the owner. The owner or operator of the railroad shall construct and at all times maintain such farm or private crossing in a good, safe, and passable condition. The commission shall have the authority to determine the necessity for any crossing and the place, manner, and conditions under which the crossing shall be constructed and maintained, and shall fix
 and assess the cost and expense thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7538.

At every farm or private grade crossing of a railroad where no automatic grade crossing protective device is in place there shall be installed, as a means of protecting the crossing, one or more stop signs of the type described in Section 21400 of the Vehicle Code or of such other design as the commission may prescribe unless, after a hearing, the commission shall find that the installation of such sign or signs at a particular crossing would create a hazard or dangerous condition that would not otherwise exist. At any grade crossing where stop signs are installed or in place, before traversing such crossing the driver of any vehicle shall stop such vehicle not less than
 10 nor more than 50 feet from the nearest rail of the track and while so stopped shall listen, and look in both directions along the track, for any approaching train or other equipment using such rails. The vehicle shall remain standing while any train or other equipment using such rails is approaching the crossing and is close enough to constitute a hazard. A driver of any vehicle who fails to keep his vehicle standing while any train or equipment using such rails is approaching the crossing and which is so close as to constitute a hazard is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 351.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Rights of Way and Franchises [7551. - 7557.]

7551.

Every railroad corporation is granted the right of way for the location, construction, and maintenance of its necessary works, and for every necessary adjunct thereto, over any swamp, overflowed, or other public lands of the State not otherwise disposed of or in use, not in any case exceeding in length or width that which is necessary for the construction of such works and adjuncts, or for the protection thereof, and in no case to exceed 200 feet in width.

These grants do not apply to public lands of the State within the corporate limits of cities, or within three miles thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7551.1.

The Secretary of Transportation may grant to every railroad corporation whose primary business is the transportation of passengers the rights-of-way for the location, construction, and maintenance of its necessary works and for every necessary adjunct thereto over any portion of highway owned by the State of California which is not otherwise disposed of or in use, not in any case exceeding in length or width that which is necessary for the construction of works and adjuncts, or for the protection thereof, and in no case to exceed 200 feet in width.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 496.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

7551.3.

(a) To ensure that a fair and reasonable price is paid for public acquisition of railroad rights-of-way, it is the intent of the Legislature to have railroad rights-of-way valuation procedures and guidelines developed and adopted for use when state and federal funds are expended.

(b) The Secretary of Transportation in collaboration with other public agencies and within existing resources, shall develop recommended procedures and guidelines for valuation of railroad rights-of-way.

(c) The recommended procedures and guidelines shall be transmitted to the Legislature and Governor on or
 before March 1, 1994.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 497.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

7552.

(a) Every railroad corporation is granted the right, subject to subdivision (b), to take from any of the lands belonging to the state, adjacent to the works of the corporation, all materials, such as wood, stone, and earth, naturally appurtenant thereto, which may be necessary and convenient for the construction of its works and adjuncts.

(b) Except as specified in subdivision (c), before a railroad corporation may take the materials specified in subdivision (a), the railroad corporation shall enter into an agreement with the Department of General Services to
 reimburse the state for the full value of the removed materials. The agreement shall contain a provision requiring the railroad corporation to return the land and timber to the natural state which existed prior to the removal of the materials, to the extent it is reasonable to do so, if the Department of General Services determines that requirement to be appropriate.

(c) A railroad corporation may take the materials specified in subdivision (a) without previously entering into the agreement specified in subdivision (b) if the railroad takes these materials for the purpose of reopening a rail line which was closed due to an unforseeable or unexpected event. However, within 30 days after reopening the rail line, the railroad corporation shall enter into an agreement with the Department of General Services to reimburse the state for the full value of the removed materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 325, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7553.

When any selection of a right of way, or land for an adjunct to the works of a railroad corporation, is made by any corporation, the secretary thereof shall transmit to the State Lands Commission, the State Controller, and the recorder of the county in which the selected lands are situate, a plat of the lands so selected, giving the extent thereof and uses for which the lands are claimed or desired, duly verified to be correct. If approved, the State Lands Commission shall so endorse the plat, and issue to the corporation a permit to use the lands, unless, on petition properly presented to the court, a review is had and such use prohibited.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7554.

If any corporation receiving state lands or appurtenances thereunder is dissolved, ceases to exist, is discontinued, or the route or line of its works is so changed as not to cover or cross the lands selected, or the use of the lands selected is abandoned, the selected lands revert, and the title is reinvested in the State or its grantees, free from all such uses.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7555.

No railroad corporation may use any street, alley, or highway, or any of the land, whether covered by water or otherwise, owned by any city or county, unless the right to do so is granted by a vote of the governing body of the city or county. If any railroad corporation operating within a city or county applies to the governing body of the city or county for a franchise or permit to cross any such street, alley, or highway, with main, branch, side, switching, or spur trackage, the governing body of the city or county, within a reasonable time, shall hold a public hearing upon the application after reasonable notice to the applicant and to the public and shall thereafter
 grant the franchise or permit applied for upon reasonable terms and conditions unless such governing body reasonably finds that the grant of the franchise or permit would be detrimental to the public interest of the city or county. Nothing in this section imposes any duty upon or limits the authority of, any city organized and existing pursuant to a freeholder’s charter, or any officer thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 767.)
-------------------------------------------

7556.

The governing body of a county, city and county, or city, under such regulations, restrictions, and limitations, and upon such terms and payment of license tax as the county, city and county, or city may provide, may grant franchises to railroad corporations for the construction of elevated or underground railroad tracks over, across, or under the streets and public highways of any such county, city and county, or city, for a term not exceeding 50 years. Before granting such franchise there shall be presented to the governing body a petition signed by the owners of a majority of the landed property, other than public property, on the line of the elevated portion applied
 for.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7556.1.

Notwithstanding Section 7556, to railroad corporations whose primary business is the transportation of passengers, the governing body of a county, city and county, or city under regulations, restrictions, and limitations, and upon terms and payment of a license tax as the county, city and county, or city may provide, may grant franchises for the construction of elevated or underground railroad tracks over, across, or under the public streets and highways of the county, city and county, or city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1553, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

7557.

Where any railroad or street railroad tracks are located on property that a public entity is authorized to acquire by eminent domain for road, highway, boulevard, street, or alley purposes or on property that a city, county, or municipal water district is authorized to acquire by eminent domain for the right-of-way of a public utility that it will construct, complete, and maintain, the plaintiff may require the relocation or removal of such tracks by exercise of the power of eminent domain. In such case, the complaint shall contain a description and map of the location and proposed location of such tracks.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Conditional Sale of Railroad Equipment [7576. - 7578.]

7576.

In any contract for the sale of railroad or street railway equipment or rolling stock, it is lawful to agree that title to the property sold or contracted to be sold, although possession thereof may be delivered immediately or at any time or times subsequently, shall not vest in the purchaser until the purchase price is fully paid, or that the seller shall have and retain a lien thereon for the unpaid purchase money.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7577.

In any contract for the leasing or hiring of railroad or street railway equipment or rolling stock, it is lawful to stipulate for a conditioned sale thereof at the termination of the contract, and that the rentals or amounts to be received under the contract may, as paid, be applied and treated as purchase money, and that the title to the property shall not vest in the lessee or bailee until the purchase price has been paid in full and until the terms of the contract have been fully performed, notwithstanding delivery to and possession by the lessee or bailee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7578.

No contract of the type provided for in this article shall be valid as against any subsequent judgment creditor or any subsequent bona fide purchaser for value and without notice, unless all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The contract is evidenced by an instrument executed by the parties and duly acknowledged by the vendee, lessee, or bailee, as the case may be, or duly proved before some person authorized by law to take acknowledgments of deeds, and in the same manner as deeds are
 acknowledged or proved.

(b) Each car or locomotive engine so sold, leased, or hired, or contracted to be sold, leased, or hired has the name of the vendor, lessor, or bailor plainly marked in letters not less than one inch in size on each side thereof, followed by the word “owner,” or “lessor,” or “bailor,” as the case may be.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 829, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Railroad Equipment [7601. - 7614.]

7601.
